Utah statutes.
63G-6a-1004.   Exception for federally funded contracts.

This part does not apply to the extent it conflicts with federal requirements relating to a procurement that involves the expenditure of federal assistance, federal contract funds, or federal financial participation funds.



Enacted by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session

